Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Article 6. Crime Prevention Programs.

§§ 9.1-158 through 9.1-160.
Repealed by Acts 2011, cc. 821 and 854, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

9.1-158

, which established the Crime Prevention Center, was derived from Acts 1994, cc. 60, 868, § 9-173.16; 2001, c. 844.

Former § 9.1-159, pertaining to the creation of McGruff House Program, was derived from Acts 1994, cc. 60, 868, § 9-173.17; 2001, c. 844.

Former § 9.1-160, pertaining to the designation of McGruff House, was derived from Acts 1994, cc. 60, 868, § 9-173.18; 2001, c. 844.

§ 9.1-161.
Crime prevention specialists; duties.

The Board shall adopt regulations establishing minimum standards for certification of crime prevention specialists. Such regulations shall require that the chief law-enforcement officer of the locality or the campus police departments of institutions of higher education established by Article 3 (§

23.1-809

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 23.1 wherein the person serves shall approve the certification before a candidate for certification may serve as a crime prevention specialist. A crime prevention specialist shall have the duty to:

Provide citizens living within his jurisdiction information concerning personal safety and the security of property, and other matters relating to the reduction of criminal opportunity;

Provide business establishments within his jurisdiction information concerning business and employee security, and other matters relating to reduction of criminal activity;

Provide citizens and businesses within his jurisdiction assistance in forming and maintaining neighborhood and business watch groups and other community-based crime prevention programs;

Provide assistance to other units of government within his jurisdiction in developing plans and procedures related to the reduction of criminal activity within government and the community; and

Promote the reduction and prevention of crime within his jurisdiction and the Commonwealth.

History.

1994, cc. 60, 868, § 9-173.19; 2001, c. 844; 2004, c. 466.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Article 3 (§

23.1-809

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 23.1” was substituted for “Chapter 17 (§ 23-232 et seq.) of Title 23” to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 466 inserted the second sentence in the introductory paragraph.

§ 9.1-162.
Eligibility for crime prevention specialists.

Any employee of a local, state or federal government agency who serves in a law-enforcement, crime prevention or criminal justice capacity is eligible to be trained and certified as a crime prevention specialist.

The chief executive of any local, state or federal government agency may designate one or more employees in his department or office, who serves in a law-enforcement, crime prevention or criminal justice capacity, to be trained and certified as a crime prevention specialist.

No person who is a candidate for certification shall serve as a crime prevention specialist unless his certification is approved by the chief law-enforcement officer of the locality wherein the person serves.

History.

1994, cc. 60, 868, § 9-173.20; 2001, c. 844; 2002, c. 209; 2004, c. 466.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 209 substituted “local, state or federal government agency who serves in a law-enforcement, crime prevention or criminal justice capacity is” for “local or state law-enforcement agency shall be” in the first paragraph, and substituted “local, state or federal government” for “local or state law-enforcement” and inserted “who serves in a law-enforcement, crime prevention or criminal justice capacity” in the second paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 466 added the last paragraph.